Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16B.981, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Financial information required; determination of ability to perform. For grants of $50,000 or more and subject to sections 16B.97 and 16B.98, before an agency awards a competitive, legislatively named, single-source, or sole-source grant, the agency must complete a preaward risk assessment to assess the risk that a potential grantee cannot or would not perform the required duties. In making this assessment, the agency must review the following information as applicable: (1) the potential grantee's history of performing duties similar to those required by the grant, whether the grant requires the potential grantee to perform services at a significantly increased scale, and whether the grant will require significant changes to the operation of the potential grantee's organization; (2) for a potential grantee that is a nonprofit organization, the potential grantee's most recent Form 990 or Form 990-EZ filed with the Internal Revenue Service. If the potential grantee has not been in existence long enough or is not required to file Form 990 or Form 990-EZ, the potential grantee must demonstrate to the agency's satisfaction that the potential grantee is exempt and must instead submit the potential grantee's most recent board-reviewed financial statements and documentation of internal controls or, if there is no such board, by the applicant's managing group; (3) for a potential grantee that is a for-profit business, the potential grantee's most recent federal and state tax returns, current financial statements, certification that the business is not under bankruptcy proceedings, and disclosure of any liens on its assets. If a business has not been in business long enough to have a tax return, the grantee must demonstrate to the agency's satisfaction that the grantee has appropriate internal financial controls; (4) evidence of good standing with the secretary of state under chapter 317A, or other applicable lawnew text begin , including but not limited to evidence of current registration as a charitable organization with the attorney general under section 309.52, unless exempt from registrationnew text end ; (5) if the potential grantee isnew text begin a charitable organizationnew text end required to complete an audit under section 309.53, subdivision 3, the potential grantee's most recent audit report performed by an independent third party in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles; and (6) certification, provided by the potential grantee, that none of its current principals have been convicted of a felony financial crime in the last ten years. For this section, a principal is defined as a public official, a board member, or staff with the authority to access funds provided by this agency or determine how those funds are used. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16B.981, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Conditions under which an agency is prohibited from awarding grant. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding subdivisions 4 and 5, an agency is prohibited from awarding a grant to a potential grantee that is unable to provide the information required in subdivision 2, as applicable, until the potential grantee is able to provide all required information. new text end